Utah statutes.
75-5a-116.   Custodian's expenses, compensation, and bond.
(1)  A custodian is entitled to reimbursement from custodial property for
reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the custodian's duties.
(2)  Except for one who is a transferor under Section 75-5a-105, a custodian
has a noncumulative election during each calendar year to charge reasonable
compensation for services performed during that year.
(3)  Except as provided in Subsection 75-5a-119 (6), a custodian need not give
a bond.
